Washington statutes.
RCW 21.35.045

Transfer on death—Contract—Rights of creditors.

(1) A transfer on death resulting from a registration in beneficiary form is effective by reason of the contract regarding the registration between the owner and the registering entity and this chapter and is not testamentary.

(2) This chapter does not limit the rights of creditors of security owners against beneficiaries and other transferees under other laws of this state.

[ 1993 c 287 s 9.]